Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-520
Class I, II, or III school district; board of education; selection of officers; rules and regulations; compensation.

The board of education of a Class I, II, or III school district has power to select its own officers and make its own rules and regulations not inconsistent with any statute applicable to such district. No member of the board, except the secretary, shall accept or receive any compensation for services performed in discharging the duties of his or her office.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XIV, § 7, p. 379;

Laws 1899, c. 62, § 8, p. 293;

Laws 1901, c. 63, § 9, p. 440;

R.S.1913, § 6954;

C.S.1922, § 6588;

C.S.1929, § 79-2507;

R.S.1943, § 79-2509;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 240, p. 771;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-807;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 273;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 37.
July 19, 2024